Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 26 Levy and Sale on Execution

9-26-1.
“Trustee” defined.

The word “trustee”, wherever occurring in this chapter, shall be deemed to include the words “attorney”, “agent”, “factor”, or “debtor”.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 596; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 550, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-1

.

9-26-2.
Duty to execute and return writs.

Every officer to whom a writ of execution or other judicial writ shall be lawfully issued shall execute the mandates therein contained as commanded, and shall make returns of his or her doings thereon. If he or she is unable to execute the mandates, he or she shall set forth the reason of his or her failure in his or her return.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 624; G.L. 1909, ch. 304, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 355, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 553, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-2

.

9-26-3.
Body of deceased person exempt.

The body of a deceased person shall not be liable to be taken for debt or damages on execution or upon any process whatsoever; and if any officer shall, under color of an execution or process, seize or take the body of any deceased person for debt or damages, he or she shall be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or be imprisoned not exceeding six (6) months.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 625; G.L. 1909, ch. 304, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 355, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 553, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-3

.

9-26-4.
Property exempt from attachment.

The following goods and property shall be exempt from attachment on any warrant of distress or on any other writ, original, mesne, or judicial:

The necessary wearing apparel of a debtor or of the debtor’s family, if he or she has a family.

The working tools of a debtor necessary in the debtor’s usual occupation, not exceeding in value the sum of two thousand dollars ($2,000), and the professional library of any professional person in actual practice.

The household furniture, clothing, and family stores of a debtor, including beds and bedding, not exceeding in value the sum of nine thousand six hundred dollars ($9,600).

The bibles, school books, and other books in use in the family, not exceeding in value the sum of three hundred dollars ($300).

The debtor’s interest in one lot or right of burial, as the case may be, in any cemetery.

Wages due or accruing to any sailor.

Debts secured by bills of exchange or negotiable promissory notes.

The entire salary or wages of any debtor due or payable from any charitable corporation, or from any person or corporation engaged in the disbursement or administration of any public charitable fund or money, whenever the salaries or wages are to be paid or supplied, directly or indirectly, from any fund or money appropriated or contributed for the relief of the poor or in aid of unemployment, and the debtor is the object of the relief or aid.

The entire wages or salary of any debtor due or payable from any employer, where the debtor has been the object of relief from any state, federal, or municipal corporation or agency for a period of one year from and after the time when the debtor ceases to be the object of such relief.

The salary or wages due or payable to any other debtor, not exceeding the sum of fifty dollars ($50.00).

The salary and wages of the wife and the minor children of any debtor.

Such other property, real, personal, or mixed, in possession or actions as is or shall be exempted from attachment and execution, either permanently or temporarily, by general or special acts, charters of incorporation, or by the policy of the law.

An individual retirement account or individual retirement annuity as defined in the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. §§ 408 and 408A, and the payments or distributions from such an account or annuity, except that this exemption does not apply to any of the following:

An order of a court pursuant to a judgment of divorce or separate maintenance.

An order of a court concerning child support.

Contributions to an individual retirement account, or premiums on an individual retirement annuity, including the earnings or benefits from those contributions or premiums that constitute an excess contribution within the meaning of Section 4973 of the Internal Revenue Code, [26 U.S.C. § 4973].

The right or interest of a person in an annuity, pension, profit sharing, or other retirement plan protected by the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, Public Law 93-406, 29 U.S.C. § 1001 et seq. This exemption shall also apply to the operation of the Federal Bankruptcy Code, as permitted by 11 U.S.C. § 522(d)(10)(E). This exemption shall not apply to the right or interest of a person in an annuity, pension, profit sharing, or other retirement plan to the extent that that right or interest is subject to any of the following:

An order of the court pursuant to a judgment of divorce or separate maintenance.

An order of a court concerning child support.

This exemption shall not apply to contributions to, and the earnings of, any of the retirement plans enumerated in this subdivision that are not qualified retirement plans as defined by the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 401.

Any and all motor vehicles owned by the debtor not to exceed an aggregate total of twelve thousand dollars ($12,000).

Any and all jewelry owned by the debtor not to exceed an aggregate total of two thousand dollars ($2,000).

An account balance, right, or interest of a person in a “prepaid tuition program” or a “tuition savings program” as defined in §

16-57-3(10)

and (16), respectively. This exemption shall not apply to a balance, right, or interest to the extent that the balance, right, or interest is subject to any of the following:

An order of a court pursuant to a judgment of divorce or separate maintenance;

An order of a court concerning child support.

In addition to the exemptions herein, a debtor in bankruptcy may exempt an additional six thousand five hundred dollars ($6,500) in any assets.

The real property of any person having debts secured by casino-issued lines of credit, also known as “casino markers,” that are issued to casino patrons by the casino credit department or other department or agency of the casino.

Savings or other deposits held in a banking or financial institution not exceeding the sum of five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 601; G.L. 1909, ch. 302, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 352, § 5; P.L. 1932, ch. 1887, § 1; P.L. 1937, ch. 2532, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 557, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; P.L. 1951, ch. 2749, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 3032, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-4

; P.L. 1966, ch. 139, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 376, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 428, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 347, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 333, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 264, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 364, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 292, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 503, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 502, § 4; P.L. 2014, ch. 529, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 366, § 1, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 367, § 1, effective June 29, 2022.

9-26-4.1.
Homestead estate exemption.

In addition to the property exempt from attachment as set forth in §

9-26-4

, an estate of homestead to the extent of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in the land and buildings, or personal property that the owner uses as a residence, may be acquired pursuant to this section by an owner of a home or an individual who rightfully possesses the premises by lease, as a life tenant, as a beneficiary of a revocable or irrevocable trust or otherwise, and who occupies or intends to occupy the home as his or her principal residence. The estate of homestead provided pursuant to this section shall be automatic by operation of law, and without any requirement or necessity for the filing of a declaration, a statement in a deed, or any other documentation. The estate shall be exempt from the laws of attachment, levy on execution, and sale for payment of debts or legacies, except in the following cases:

Sale for taxes, sewer liens, water liens, lighting district assessments, and fire district assessments;

For a debt contracted prior to the acquisition of the estate of homestead;

For a debt contracted for the purchase of the home;

Upon an order issued by the family court to enforce its judgment that a spouse pay a certain amount weekly or otherwise for the support of a spouse or minor children;

Where a building or buildings are situated on land not owned by the owner of a homestead estate are attached, levied upon or sold for the ground rent of the lot upon which the building or buildings are situated;

For a debt due to, or a lien in favor of, the department of human services and/or the state of Rhode Island for reimbursement of medical assistance, as provided for in §

40-8-15

;

For a debt heretofore or hereafter owing to a federally insured deposit-taking institution or a person regulated or licensed under title 19.

For the purposes of this section, “owner of a home” includes a sole owner, lessee (but only a lessee who or that was the owner of a home prior to a transfer to the lessor), joint tenant, tenant by the entirety, or tenant in common; provided, that only one individual may acquire an estate of homestead in the home for the benefit of his or her family; and provided further, that an estate of homestead may be acquired on only one principal residence for the benefit of a family. For the purposes of this section, “family” includes either a parent and child or children, a husband and wife and their children, if any, or a sole owner. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any debt owing to a regulated institution, a debt secured by a mortgage or other voluntary lien on a home, or a mechanics’ lien on the property comprising the estate as provided for under chapter 28 of title 34. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, it shall not be necessary to record a declaration of homestead in order to take advantage of the homestead estate exemption.

An estate of homestead shall be subordinate to a mortgage encumbering the home that was signed by all the owners of the home at the time of execution of said mortgage. A mortgage executed by fewer than all of the owners of a home that is subject to an estate of homestead shall be superior only to the homestead estate of the owners who are parties to the mortgage and their non-titled spouses and minor children, if any.

For purposes of this chapter, a mortgage shall include an instrument granting a security interest in a manufactured home or cooperative housing unit. The subordination shall not require the signature of a spouse who is not an owner. No statement that a homestead estate shall be subordinate to the mortgage shall be required in the mortgage instrument and nothing contained in a mortgage or any document executed in connection with the mortgage shall affect or be construed to create, modify, or terminate a homestead estate, other than to subordinate it to the mortgage as aforesaid. A mortgage lender shall not require or record a release of homestead in connection with the making and recording of a mortgage.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 270, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 189, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 226, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 409, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 376, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 392, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 515, § 1.

9-26-5.
Exemption of police and firefighters’ pensions — Assignments invalid.

No interest of any person in any pension fund or in any pension derivable therefrom, for the benefit of police officers or firefighters, now or hereafter created or held by authority of law by any city or town, or by any public officer or officers or board of officers therein, to which fund the city or town contributes in any way, shall be subject to trustee process or liable to attachment on any writ, original, mesne, or judicial, or be taken on execution or any process, legal or equitable; and no assignment of any such interest shall be valid.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 602; G.L. 1909, ch. 302, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 352, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 557, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-5

.

9-26-6.
Setoff of executions.

If any officer shall, at the same time, have two or more executions delivered to him or her to serve, in which the parties shall be reversed, and shall sue and be sued in the same right and capacity, he or she shall set off the debts or damages in the actions and levy and collect the balance only that shall remain due thereon, with the costs on all the executions.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 626; G.L. 1909, ch. 304, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 355, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 553, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-6

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 73.

9-26-7.
Mortgaged personal property.

Personal estate, when mortgaged and in the possession of the mortgagor, and while the mortgage is redeemable either at law or in equity, may be levied on by execution against the mortgagor in the same manner as on his or her unincumbered personal estate.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 627; G.L. 1909, ch. 304, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 355, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 553, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-7

.

9-26-8.
Sale of mortgaged property.

When levied on, whether by virtue of an attachment or otherwise, mortgaged property shall be sold by the officer as in other cases of levies on personal property on executions.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 628; G.L. 1909, ch. 304, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 355, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 553, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-8

.

9-26-9.
Proceeds of sale of mortgaged property.

The proceeds of the sale shall be applied to the payment of the amount due on the mortgage, with such deduction for interest for the anticipated payment, or allowance for damages for such anticipated payment, as may be ascertained and allowed by the court to which the execution is returnable, and the balance shall be applied to the payment of the amount due on the execution.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 629; G.L. 1909, ch. 304, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 355, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 553, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-9

.

9-26-10.
Redemption of mortgaged property by plaintiff in execution.

In case of such levy, the plaintiff in execution may redeem the mortgaged property in the same manner as the mortgagor might have done, and upon the redemption shall have the same lien on the property for the amount paid by him or her, with interest, as the mortgagee had.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 630; G.L. 1909, ch. 304, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 355, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 553, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-10

.

9-26-11.
Attachment void unless mortgage redeemed or property sold.

If the mortgage is not redeemed by the plaintiff or sold as provided in §

9-26-8

, before the time of redemption expires, the attachment shall become void.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 631; G.L. 1909, ch. 304, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 355, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 553, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-11

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 23.

9-26-12.
Retention of goods levied on by officer — Perishable goods.

In all cases when execution shall be levied on any goods or chattels, the goods and chattels shall be kept in the possession of the officer and shall be advertised at least ten (10) days before they shall be exposed and offered for sale, in order that the person who owned the goods or chattels may, if he or she think fit, pay the money due, together with the costs which shall have accrued thereon, and thereupon have his or her goods or chattels restored to him or her again; provided, that if the goods and chattels shall be of a quickly perishable nature, the officer levying execution thereon shall immediately notify the defendant or his or her agent thereof, and may obtain an order from the court, or any justice thereof, issuing the execution, to sell the goods and chattels at such time and in such manner as the court or justice may prescribe, and the order may be obtained at any time. Such an order to the officer may also be obtained by either party or his or her agent.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 632; G.L. 1909, ch. 304, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 355, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 553, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-12

.

9-26-13.
Sale at auction — Surplus proceeds.

In case the owner shall not redeem them as provided in §

9-26-12

, and in case they are not sold under special order, the officer shall sell the goods or chattels at public auction to the highest bidder, and in any case if any surplus shall remain after the debt or damages and costs and charges are paid, the surplus shall be delivered by the officer to the owner or to any person legally qualified on his or her behalf to receive the surplus.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 633; G.L. 1909, ch. 304, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 355, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 553, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-13

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 23.

9-26-14.
Recording of execution against real estate.

Whenever execution is to be levied upon real estate or any interest therein, the officer charged with the service of the execution shall file with the recorder of deeds, if any, or with the town clerk or the city clerk of the town or city in which the real estate shall lie, a copy of the execution, with his or her doings thereon, together with a description of the real estate or interest therein to be so levied upon, and the recorder of deeds, if any, or the town clerk or city clerk shall note upon the copy of the execution the exact time, as nearly as may be, when the execution was filed in his or her office, and shall also enter in a book, to be kept by him or her for that purpose, the names of all the parties in the execution, including the name of any partnership set forth in the writ where any real property of a defendant whose property is being levied upon is held in a partnership name, the amount of the judgment, the time when the copy was filed in his or her office, and the name of the court to which and the time when the execution is returnable, and shall be entitled to demand and to receive from the officer a fee of fifty cents ($.50) in each case.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 635; G.L. 1909, ch. 304, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 355, § 11, 12; P.L. 1932, ch. 1905, § 1; P.L. 1933, ch. 2032, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 553, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-14

; P.L. 1985, ch. 93, § 2.

9-26-15.
Recording effective as levy.

The filing of the copy of the execution with the recorder of deeds, if any, or with the town clerk or city clerk, as provided in §

9-26-14

, shall constitute and be deemed a good and sufficient levy upon the real estate or any interest therein so described upon the copy of the execution.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 355, § 12; P.L. 1932, ch. 1905, § 1; P.L. 1933, ch. 2032, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 553, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-15

.

9-26-16.
Advertisement and sale of real estate levied on — Disposition of proceeds.

The officer shall give public notice of the levy and of the intended sale of the real estate or interest therein under the levy: first by mailing by certified mail return receipt requested to the record owner of the real estate as of the date sixty (60) days prior to the scheduled sale date, including the day of the mailing in the computation, without reference to any adjournment, continuation, or postponement of the sale, at the address of the real estate and, if different, at the owner’s address listed with the tax collector’s office of the city or town where the real estate is situated as of such date at least twenty (20) days prior to first publishing the notice, including the day of the mailing in the computation; second by causing an advertisement thereof to be published once a week for the space of three (3) weeks next before the time of the sale in some public newspaper published in the county where the real estate lies, and if no such public newspaper is published therein, then in some public newspaper published daily in the city of Providence; and third by mailing written notice of the time and place of the sale by certified mail return receipt requested to all persons who have recorded a mortgage, attachment, lien, or any other encumbrance relating to the real estate under the levy which is junior or subordinate to the levy at the address, if any, of the holder of the mortgage, attachment, lien, or other encumbrance as set forth in the recorded instrument or to the address of the holder’s attorney as set forth in the recorded mortgage, attachment, lien, or other encumbrance at least fourteen (14) days prior to the scheduled sale date, without regard to any adjournment, continuation, or postponement of the sale. If no such address shall be set forth in the mortgage, attachment, lien, or other encumbrance or if the instrument shall not have been recorded more than thirty (30) days prior to the scheduled sale date, without reference to any adjournment, continuation, or postponement of the sale, no such notice need be mailed to the holder of any such mortgage, attachment, lien, or other encumbrance. If any such notice is so mailed but is undeliverable to the owner or the holder, is refused by the owner or the holder, is unclaimed by the owner or the holder, or if the owner’s or holder’s forwarding notice shall have expired, or if the notice shall otherwise not be delivered by the United States Postal Service, the notice requirement shall be deemed satisfied. If a notice is not given prior to the sale to all persons who have recorded a mortgage, attachment, lien, or any other encumbrance relating to the levied premises, which is junior or subordinate to the execution, the encumbrance shall survive the sale for a period of one year from the date of sale unless a written notice of commencement of foreclosure proceedings of the mortgage or a written notice of intent to enforce the attachment, lien, or other encumbrance is recorded in the land evidence records in the city or town where the levied premises are located. Failure to record written notice within one year of the sale shall render the mortgage, attachment, lien, or other encumbrance, which is junior or subordinate to the execution, unenforceable. If no person redeem the real estate or interest therein before the real estate shall be exposed for sale, which sale shall not be earlier than three (3) months after levy, the officer shall sell the real estate, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to satisfy the judgment obtained and the costs and charges, at public auction, and a deed thereof, by him or her given, shall vest in the purchaser all the estate, right, and interest which the debtor had therein at the time the estate was attached, or in case there was no attachment, all the estate, right, and interest which the debtor had at the time the levy was made, and the surplus of money that shall arise from the sale of the real estate or interest therein after satisfying the execution and the costs and charges shall be deposited with the general treasurer for the owner thereof, and shall be liable to be attached for his or her other debts.

The officer shall include in the deed given an affidavit of compliance with the requirements of written notice of the sale as set forth in subsection (a).

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, §§ 634, 637; G.L. 1909, ch. 304, §§ 11, 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 355, §§ 11, 13, 14; P.L. 1932, ch. 1905, § 1; P.L. 1933, ch. 2032, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 553, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-16

; P.L. 1992, ch. 224, § 1.

9-26-17.
Adjournment of sale.

The officer may, for good cause, from time to time adjourn the sale of the real estate or of any interest therein levied on, giving one week’s notice thereof by publication in some public newspaper in the manner as provided in §

9-26-16

.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 636; G.L. 1909, ch. 304, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 355, §§ 13, 14; P.L. 1932, ch. 1905, § 1; P.L. 1933, ch. 2032, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 553, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-17

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 23.

9-26-18.
Sale after return day of execution.

The sale shall be made under the execution levied thereon, although the return day thereof may have passed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 638; G.L. 1909, ch. 304, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 355, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 553, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-18

.

9-26-19.
Form of deed on execution sale.

The following shall be substantially the form of the deed to be given whenever real estate is levied upon and sold as provided in this chapter:

And there shall be annexed to the deed, and forming a part thereof, a copy of the execution and the officer’s return thereon, duly certified by the officer.

TO ALL PEOPLE TO WHOM THESE PRESENTS SHALL COME. send Greeting: Whereas an execution against at the suit of was by me the said
on the day of levied on (here describe the premises); and whereas on the day of all the estate, right, title, interest, and property of the said in the premises aforesaid, were by me, the said sold at public auction, for the satisfaction of the said execution, to , who was the highest bidder, for the sum of which the said
hath since well and truly paid to me the said : NOW KNOW YE, that by force and virtue of the law in such case made and provided, I, the said in consideration of the sum of money paid unto me as aforesaid, do by these presents bargain, sell, assign, and set over unto the said heirs and assigns forever, all the estate, right, title, interest, property, freehold, and inheritance of the said of, in and to the said premises and appurtenances at the time of the levy thereon. TO HAVE AND TO HOLD the said premises and appurtenances to the said heirs and assigns forever. IN WITNESS, &C.

Click to view

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 639; G.L. 1909, ch. 304, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 355, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 553, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-19

.

9-26-20.
Time of attachment shown in deed.

Whenever attachment shall have been made by original writ or writ of mesne process, the officer shall insert the time thereof and vary his or her deed accordingly.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 640; G.L. 1909, ch. 304, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 355, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 553, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-20

.

9-26-21.
Copies of execution records as evidence.

A certified copy of the record of execution and return shall be admissible as evidence of the contents of the execution and return; and in the event of the destruction, loss, or obliteration of the return, amendments thereof may be allowed to be made upon a copy of the record certified by the city clerk, town clerk, or recorder of deeds, as the case may be, of the city or town wherein the deed, execution, or return shall have been recorded, with the same effect as if the amendment had been made on the original return.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 641; G.L. 1909, ch. 304, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 355, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 553, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-21

.

9-26-22.
Levy on attached stock.

Whenever execution shall issue against a defendant whose stock or shares in any banking association or any body corporate established within this state shall have been attached, the officer charged therewith shall serve a copy of the execution, if a bank, upon the cashier; if an insurance company, upon the president or secretary; if any other corporate body within this state, upon the treasurer or person executing the duties of treasurer; and if any foreign corporation, upon the clerk or agent or its attorney authorized to accept service of process in its behalf in this state; which shall be deemed a good and sufficient levy of the execution upon the stock or shares of the defendant in the company, provided the levying officer complies with the requirements of § 6A-8-317 [repealed].

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 642; G.L. 1909, ch. 304, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 355, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 553, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-22

; P.L. 1960, ch. 147, § 3.

9-26-23.
Sale and transfer of stock.

The stock or shares, or so much thereof as shall be necessary, shall be advertised and sold in the same manner as other personal property levied on by execution, and a deed or deeds thereof given by the officer shall vest in the purchaser all the right, title, and interest of the defendant in the shares so sold, and shall be recorded by the recording officer of the company, subject to the provisions of § 6A-8-317.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 643; G.L. 1909, ch. 304, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 355, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 553, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-23

; P.L. 1960, ch. 147, § 3.

9-26-24.
Levy on corporate stock not previously attached.

The stock or shares of any person whatsoever in any banking association or in any incorporated company within this state, or in any foreign corporation having an attorney in this state appointed by law upon whom service of process against it can be made according to the provisions of chapter 5 of this title, shall be liable to be levied on by execution duly obtained, like other personal property; and the execution being directed to the proper officer according to law, he or she may levy the stock and shares, in the manner set forth in §§

9-26-22

and

9-26-23

, upon any stock or shares of the defendant to be found within his or her precinct, and shall proceed to advertise and sell and give deeds thereof in the manner therein prescribed subject to the requirements of § 6A-8-317 [repealed].

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 644; G.L. 1909, ch. 304, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 355, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 553, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-24

; P.L. 1960, ch. 147, § 3.

9-26-25.
Execution against corporations — Action against officers and stockholders.

Whenever final judgment for any sum shall be rendered by any court against any banking association or any incorporated company, execution on the judgment shall be issued against the goods, chattels, and real estate of the corporation; and whenever any execution shall be, by the officer charged with the service thereof, returned that he or she cannot find sufficient property of the corporation whereon to levy the execution, the party in whose favor the judgment shall have been rendered may bring a civil action in the court in which the judgment was rendered against the president and directors, trustees, managers, or other like officers of the corporation, if any such there are, and, if none, then against so many of the stockholders or members thereof as he or she may think fit.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 645; G.L. 1909, ch. 304, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 355, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 553, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-25

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 45.

9-26-26.
Execution against corporation officers and stockholders.

On the hearing of the action authorized by §

9-26-25

, unless the president and directors, trustees, managers, or other like officers, stockholders, or members shall make it appear that they had not, at the time of the service of process upon them, within their possession and control, sufficient property of the corporation to satisfy the judgment or any part thereof, the court shall issue execution against the president, directors, trustees, managers, or other like officers, stockholders, or members, for the amount of the judgment, with interest and costs, as for their own private debt; but if it shall appear that the officers, stockholders, or members had property to satisfy part of the judgment only, then an execution shall issue for that amount only and costs.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 646; G.L. 1909, ch. 304, § 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 355, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 553, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-26

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 45.

9-26-27.
Interest on execution.

Every deputy sheriff, town sergeant, and constable charged with the service of any execution for any debt or damages shall levy, collect, receive, and pay over interest on the debt or damages, from the date entered on the margin, up to the time of its discharge by him or her.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 649; G.L. 1909, ch. 304, § 26; G.L. 1923, ch. 355, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 553, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-27

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 19.

9-26-28.
Execution against a deputy sheriff.

Whenever judgment shall be rendered against any person holding the office of deputy sheriff, the execution issued thereon, directed in the ordinary form, may be delivered to the division of sheriffs who, may levy on the property, subject to levy on execution, of the defendant, and proceed and sell the property according to law.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 650; G.L. 1909, ch. 304, § 27; G.L. 1923, ch. 355, § 27; G.L. 1938, ch. 553, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-28

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 19.

9-26-29.
Execution against body of a deputy sheriff for want of property.

For want of goods and chattels and real estate or other property, subject to levy on execution, the director of public safety may designate a deputy sheriff to take the body of the defendant and commit him or her to the adult correctional institutions, whenever the writ of execution shall command him or her so to do.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 651; G.L. 1909, ch. 304, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 355, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 553, § 26; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-29

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 76; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 19.

9-26-30.
Priority of attachments.

In all attachments of real estate, or of goods and chattels, or of personal estate in the hands of a trustee, or of stock or shares in any banking association or other incorporated company, he or she who shall first procure any attachment to be made for any just debt or damages shall be entitled to have his or her debt or damages satisfied before any other demand for which the property shall be attached or taken by execution at the suit of any other person, and all others in order of attachment.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 567; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 558, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-30

.

9-26-31.
Priority of levies.

In all levies on execution upon real estate, goods and chattels, stocks or shares, or other subject of levy on execution whatsoever, he or she who shall first procure the attachment, if any, or, if there is no attachment, he or she who shall first procure levy to be made, shall be entitled to have his or her debt or damages satisfied before any other demand for which the property may be subsequently attached, or levied on by execution, at the suit of any other person; and all others in order of their attachments or levies.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 647; G.L. 1909, ch. 304, § 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 355, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 558, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-31

.

9-26-32.
Time of day of levy to be noted.

As diverse levies of the same real or personal estate may happen to be made on the same day, the officer who shall make any such levy, whether of real or personal estate, shall in his or her return set forth the time of the day when the levy was made, to the end that the priority of the attaching and levying creditors may be known.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 648; G.L. 1909, ch. 304, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 355, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 558, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

9-26-32

.

9-26-33.
Discharge after twenty years of levy against real estate.

On and after July 1, 1980, any executions levied against real estate, heretofore or thereafter of record, unless the levy is against only one spouse in real estate held as tenants by the entirety, shall be deemed discharged of record and no longer a lien upon the real estate therein described or referred to after the expiration of a period of twenty (20) years from the date of judgment in the case in which the execution was issued.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 8, § 1.

9-26-34.
Attachment of state and municipal employees’ wages.

The wages or salaries of any employee of the state or of any city, town, or other municipal or quasi-governmental corporation may be levied on by attachment of any warrant of distress or any other writ or execution, original, mesne, or judicial.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 376, § 2.